Idaho, session 2026, H0850.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-3502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-3502. ELIGIBILITY FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE. (1) Notwithstanding
any provision of law or rule to the contrary, no person eligible for medic-
aid pursuant to section 56-254 or 56-267, Idaho Code, shall be eligible for
financial assistance pursuant to this chapter as it existed on March 1, 2022.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule to the contrary, no
person eligible for health insurance shall be eligible for financial assis-
tance pursuant to this chapter as it existed on March 1, 2022.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule to the contrary, no
person in a commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 3, title 66, Idaho
Code, who is eligible for medicaid or eligible for health insurance shall be
eligible for financial assistance pursuant to this chapter as it existed on
March 1, 2022.
(4) A board of county commissioners, the board of the catastrophic
health care cost program, or the department of health and welfare receiving
an application for assistance for services received through March 31, 2022,
shall process such application pursuant to this chapter as it existed on
March 1, 2022.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature that moneys saved by counties
pursuant to this section may be used for additional county aid to public
health districts as required by section 39-424A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 56-267, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 56-2205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2028.